California, session 20252026, SB1112.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 22852.1 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:22852.1. (a) (1) (A)Before the sale of a vehicle by a towing company, impound yard, or storage facility pursuant to Section 3071 or 3072 of the Civil Code, the registered owner, legal owner, lienholder, or insurer of the vehicle may have the vehicle released upon posting a bond or other adequate security with the clerk of the court in the county in which the vehicle is stored.(B)The use of a particular form for posting the bond is not required unless the clerk of the court in that county provides a required form.(2) The bond or other adequate security shall be in an amount equal to the accrued towing and storage charges at the time of release of the vehicle.(3) Upon the posting of the bond or other adequate security, the clerk of the court shall issue a certificate directing the towing company, impound yard, or storage facility to release the vehicle to the party that posted the bond or other adequate security.(4) (A) Upon receipt of a copy of the certificate directing the release of the vehicle during regular business hours, the towing company, impound yard, or storage facility shall immediately release the vehicle to the person who posted the bond or other adequate security.(B) If the towing company, impound yard, or storage facility fails to release the vehicle, the following conditions shall apply:(i) The towing company, impound yard, or storage facility shall forfeit any rights to the bond or other adequate security posted with the court and any storage fees or other charges.(ii) The towing company, impound yard, or storage facility shall pay the registered or legal owner’s attorney’s fees and costs incurred in obtaining the vehicle or securing its release.(b) The party posting the bond or other adequate security shall initiate judicial proceedings within 10 days after the issuance of the certificate by the clerk of the court, alleging a violation of at least one of the following statutes in addition to any other applicable cause of action:(1) Section 10652.5.(2) Section 12110.(3) Section 22513.(4) Section 22524.5.(5) Section 22651.07.(6) Section 22658.(7) Section 22852.(8) Section 22853.(9) Section 34507.5.(c) If the party posting the bond or other adequate security fails to initiate judicial proceedings within 10 court days of the issuance of the certificate, the bond or other adequate security is forfeited in favor of the towing company, impound yard, or storage facility.(d) An auto body shop, impound yard, or storage facility shall not knowingly participate in, or profit from, a violation enumerated in subdivision (b). An auto body shop, impound yard, or storage facility that accepts vehicles they know, or reasonably should have known, were wrongfully taken or withheld as described by a violation enumerated in subdivision (b), shall be subject to a civil fine penalty not to exceed four times the amount charged to the vehicle owner.(e) An auto body shop, storage facility, or impound yard shall comply with the provisions of Sections 3071 and 3072 of the Civil Code, as applicable, prior to conducting a lien sale. The failure to provide notice shall render storage charges void.(f) (1) By January 1, 2028, the Bureau of Automotive Repair shall develop and distribute a notice that states a vehicle owner’s rights pursuant to this section. By July 1, 2028, each towing company, impound yard, storage facility, and auto body shop shall post that notice, visible to consumers onsite. An entity that fails to comply with the notice requirement shall be subject to a civil fine not to exceed four times the amount charged to the vehicle owner.(2) An entity that fails to comply with the notice requirement shall be subject to the following:(A) A civil penalty of not more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) for the first violation.(B) A civil penalty of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for the second and any subsequent violation.(g) This section does not apply to any vehicle towed by an approved towing company and stored at an approved storage facility or impound yard at the request of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, a local law enforcement agency, the Department of Transportation, or a local transportation department or agency, if the department or agency has an administrative oversight mechanism to address violations of law.